Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.200

Permit authorizing sale of stock—Application—Contents.

An application for a permit to sell stock shall be in writing and shall be filed in the office of the director by the association.

The application shall include the following:

(1) Regarding the association:

(a) The names and addresses of its officers;

(b) The location of its office;

(c) An itemized account of its financial condition within ninety days of the filing date; and

(d) A copy of all minutes of any proceedings of its directors, shareholders, or stockholders relating to or affecting the issue of such stock;

(2) Regarding the offering:

(a) The names and addresses of the selling stockholders and of the officers of any selling corporation and the partners of any selling partnership;

(b) A copy of any contract concerning the sale of the stock;

(c) A copy of a prospectus or advertisement or other description of the stock prepared for distribution or publication in accordance with requirements prescribed by the director;

(d) A brief description of the method by which the stock is to be offered for sale including the offering price and the underwriting commissions and expense, if any; and

(3) Such additional information as the director may require.

[ 1994 c 92 s 486; 1982 c 3 s 102; 1973 c 130 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.